Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5078.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 108. The portion of highway M-22 in Leelanau County beginning at the intersection of highway M-22 and North Stallman Road and continuing north to the intersection of highway M-22 and North Putnam Road shall be known as the Company K Indian Veterans 1st Michigan Sharpshooters Civil War Memorial Highway. Clerk of the House of Representatives Secretary of the Senate Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor